Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-407.5] School bus fare revolving
fund. (a) There is established in the state treasury the school bus fare
revolving fund, into which shall be deposited all moneys received from students
and parents or guardians of students by public schools for state-provided
school busing services, as authorized by section 302A-406.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by the
legislature, moneys in the school bus fare revolving fund shall be used for
school busing services, as authorized by section 302A-406. [L 2002, c 108, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next